Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Senior and Physically Disabled Adult Discount Program

209.400.
Legislative intent. [Repealed]

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 238, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1980, ch. 406, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1988, ch. 51, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; repealed by 2018 ch. 112, § 19, effective July 14, 2018.

209.410.
Definitions. [Repealed]

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 238, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 1980, ch. 406, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 1988, ch. 51, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 248, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; repealed by 2018 ch. 112, § 19, effective July 14, 2018.

209.420.
Senior and Physically Disabled Adult Discount Program for retail goods and services. [Repealed]

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 238, § 3, effective July 15, 1980; 1980, ch. 406, § 3, effective July 15, 1980; 1988, ch. 51, § 3, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 248, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 426, § 241, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 296, effective June 20, 2005; repealed by 2018 ch. 112, § 19, effective July 14, 2018.